Illinois, session 104th, HB4550.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The following amounts, or so much of those 5amounts as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 6purposes named, are appropriated to the Office of the Auditor 7General from the General Revenue Fund to meet the ordinary and 8contingent expenses of the Office of Auditor General, as 9provided in the Illinois State Auditing Act:10For Personal Services11  For Regular Positions............................$8,000,00012  For State Contribution to Social Security..........$620,00013  Total                                            $8,620,000 14    Section 10. The sum of $37,401,560, or so much of that sum 15as may be necessary, is appropriated to the Office of the 16Auditor General from the Audit Expense Fund for administrative 17and operation expenses and for audits, studies, 18investigations, and expenses related to actuarial services. 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 202026.